Colorado statutes. TITLE 31 Government - Municipal
PART 2
FINANCE - GENERAL

31-20-201. Fiscal procedures - budgeting - appropriations.

The provisions of part 1 of article 1 of title 29, C.R.S., shall govern fiscal procedures, budgeting, and appropriations of towns and cities organized under this title.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1129, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-20-201 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-20-202. Publication - penalty.

It is the duty of the governing body of each city and town, except cities over ten thousand population, those operating under special charters, and those which have determined by election pursuant to subsection (1.5) of this section not to publish, to publish such of their proceedings as relate to the payment of bills, stating for what the same are allowed, the name of the person to whom allowed, and to whom paid. They shall also publish a statement concerning all contracts awarded and rebates allowed.

(1.5) Any city or town subject to this section may determine at a regular or special election not to publish their proceedings relating to payment of bills and statements concerning their contracts. However, no city or town shall call a special election for the sole purpose of determining whether the city or town shall publish their proceedings relating to payment of bills and statements concerning their contracts. Any city or town whose citizens elect not to publish may provide an alternative for distribution of the information.

Such publication shall be made within twenty days after the adjournment of each regular or special meeting in a newspaper of general circulation published in the city or town where such meeting is held. If there is no reliable newspaper published within said city or town, said publication shall be made in some newspaper of general circulation nearest to said city or town within the county and the clerk shall furnish copy of such proceedings for publication.

Any mayor, member of the governing body, or clerk who fails or refuses to make such publication shall be subject to a fine of not less than twenty-five dollars nor more than three hundred dollars and the costs of the suit for each offense; except that these penalties do not apply to the officials of any city or town which has elected pursuant to subsection (1.5) of this section not to make such publication.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1129, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 92:

(1) and (3) amended and (1.5) added, p. 1054, § 4, effective January 1, 1993.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former §§ 31-20-202 to 31-20-204 as they existed prior to 1975.

Cross references:

For duty of towns and cities to have an annual audit, see part 6 of article 1 of title 29.